Georgia, session 2025_26, HB549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 35-8-22 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to reimbursement
of training expenses by subsequent employer of peace officer, collection procedure, and
required documentation, is amended by revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a)(1) Unless otherwise provided by an employment contract to the contrary and subject
to paragraph (2) of this subsection, if the State of Georgia or any county or municipality
thereof employs a peace officer and said peace officer is hired by another agency within
15 36 months after completing mandated or formalized training requirements, then the
total expense of training, including salary paid during training, shall be reimbursed by the
H. B. 549
- 1 -

LC 39 4641
hiring agency to the State of Georgia or any county or municipality thereof which initially
paid for such training. If said officer is hired by another agency during a period of 15 to
24 months after mandated or formalized training requirements are completed, then
one-half of the total expense of training, including salary paid during training, shall be
reimbursed by the hiring agency to the State of Georgia or any county or municipality
thereof which initially paid for such training. The council shall set standards for
reimbursement by hiring agencies based upon actual expenses incurred in mandated or
formalized training by individual departments.
(2) The total expense of training to be reimbursed pursuant to this subsection shall be
limited to:
(A) The actual cost of any equipment and materials required by the council approved
school that the peace officer attended;
(B) The salary paid during the time the peace officer attended the basic training course
as provided for in Code Section 35-8-9, as well as any housing, meal, and transportation
costs incurred during such attendance; and
(C) Up to 90 days of salary paid during the time the peace officer participated in a field
training program."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 549
- 2 -